Utah statutes.
75-3-618.   Termination of appointment -- Special administrator.
The appointment of a special administrator terminates in accordance with the
provisions of the order of appointment or on the appointment of a general
personal representative. In other cases, the appointment of a special
administrator is subject to termination as provided in Sections 75-3-608
through 75-3-611.
